Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1293HV (1) 91 cm/ns H.F. 259 Section 1. Section 21.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Except as provided in subsection 3 , a governmental body 3 shall give notice of the time, date, and place of each meeting , 4 including a reconvened meeting of the governmental body, and 5 the tentative agenda of the meeting, in a manner reasonably 6 calculated to apprise the public of that information. 7 Reasonable 8 (1) Giving notice under this paragraph shall include 9 advising all of the following: 10 (a) Advising the news media who have filed a request for 11 notice with the governmental body and posting . 12 (b) Posting the notice on a bulletin board or other in a 13 prominent and conspicuous place which is easily accessible 14 to the public and clearly designated for that purpose at the 15 principal office of the body holding the meeting, or if no such 16 office exists, at the building in which the meeting is to be 17 held annually designated for such purposes by the governmental 18 body, in a manner such that the notice is visible at all times . 19 (c) Posting the notice on any internet site owned or 20 maintained and regularly updated by the governmental body or 21 other internet presence moderated by the governmental body, if 22 applicable. 23 (2) If a tentative agenda has been posted and is amended 24 within the time frame established in subsection 2, paragraph 25 âaâ , the governmental body shall mark the agenda âAMENDEDâ 26 and identify the amended provisions. Upon amendment, the 27 governmental body shall give notice in accordance with 28 subparagraph (1). 29 Sec. 2. Section 21.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, 30 is amended to read as follows: 31 a. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âcâ , notice 32 conforming with all of the requirements of subsection 1 shall 33 be given at least twenty-four hours prior to the commencement 34 or cancellation of any meeting of a governmental body unless 35 -1- LSB 1293HV (1) 91 cm/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 259 for good cause such notice is impossible or impractical, in 1 which case as much notice as is reasonably possible shall be 2 given. 3